Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1789
Other charges related to loans.

(1) In addition to interest charged on loans, a credit union may charge members all reasonable expenses in connection with the making, closing, disbursing, extending, collecting, or renewing of loans.

(2) A credit union may assess charges to members, in accordance with its bylaws, for failure to meet their obligations to the credit union in a timely manner.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 89.